Massachusetts, session 194th, S1198.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 59 of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition is hereby amended by inserting after the word “under” in the first instance the 
following words:- "subsection (1) of section 30 or section 30A of chapter 266, or under". 
SECTION 2. Chapter 276 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting after section 100U the following section:- 
Section 100V. (a) In a case in which a plea of not guilty has been entered by a court 
pursuant to section 59 of chapter 265 and (i) the criminal complaint is subsequently dismissed; 
(ii) the defendant is found not guilty by a judge or a jury; (iii) a finding of no probable cause is 
made by the court; or (iv) a nolle prosequi has been entered, a judge shall, upon motion of the 
defendant, seal the court appearance and disposition recorded and the clerk and the probation 

of 2 11 officers of the courts in which the proceedings occurred or were initiated shall seal the records of 
the proceedings in their files. Sealed records shall not operate to disqualify a person in any 
examination, appointment, or application for public employment in the service of the 
commonwealth or of any political subdivision. 
(b) An application for employment used by an employer that seeks information 
concerning prior arrests, convictions or adjudications of delinquency of the applicant shall 
include, in addition to the statement required under section 100A, the following statement: “An 
applicant for employment with a sealed record on file with the commissioner of probation may 
answer ‘no record’ with respect to an inquiry herein relative to prior arrests or criminal court 
appearances.” The attorney general may enforce this section by a suit in equity commenced in 
the superior court. Notwithstanding this section or any other general or special law to the 
contrary, the commissioner of probation or the clerk of courts in any district court, superior 
court, juvenile court or the Boston municipal court, in response to inquiries by authorized 
persons other than by a law enforcement agency or a court, shall, in the case of a sealed record, 
report that no record exists.